Utah statutes.
63J-1-201.7.   Legislative budget considerations -- Wage increases for certain entities -- Comprehensive health insurance pool.

(1)  In adopting a budget for each fiscal year, the Legislature shall consider an amount sufficient to grant local health departments, local mental health authorities, local substance abuse authorities, area agencies on aging, conservation districts, and Utah Association of Conservation District employees the same percentage increase for wages and benefits that is included in the budget for persons employed by the state.

(2) (a)  In adopting a budget each year for the Utah Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool, the Legislature shall determine an amount that is sufficient to fund the pool for each fiscal year.

(b)  When making a determination under this Subsection (2), the Legislature shall consider factors it determines are appropriate, which may include:

(i)  actuarial analysis of growth or decline in enrollment projected over a period of at least three years;

(ii)  actuarial analysis of the medical and pharmacy claims costs projected over a period of at least three years;

(iii)  the annual Medical Care Consumer Price Index;

(iv)  the annual base budget for the pool established by the Business, Economic Development, and Labor Appropriations Subcommittee for each fiscal year;

(v)  the growth or decline in insurance premium taxes and fees collected by the tax commission and the insurance department from the previous fiscal year; and

(vi)  the availability of surplus General Fund revenue under Section 63J-1-312 and Subsection 59-14-204(5).

(c)  In considering the factors in Subsections (2)(b)(i), (ii), and (iii), the Legislature may consider the actuarial data and projections prepared for the board of the Utah Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool as it develops its financial statements and projections for each fiscal year.

(d)  The funds appropriated by the Legislature to fund the Utah Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool as determined under this Subsection (2):

(i)  shall be deposited into the fund established by Section 31A-29-120; and

(ii)  are restricted and are to be used to maintain the operation, administration, and management of the Utah Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool created by Section 31A-29-104.



Amended by Chapter 242, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 341, 2012 General Session

